Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. Executions Defined and Classified; Hearing

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-101.
Execution defined; issuance; kinds.

An execution is a process of the court issued by the clerk and directed to the sheriff of the county. Executions may be issued to the sheriffs of different counties at the same time.

Executions are of two (2) kinds:

Against the property of the judgment debtor, including orders of sale; and

For the delivery of the possession of real property in which case the writ shall contain a specific description of the property and a command to the officer to whom the writ is delivered to deliver the property to the person entitled to it. The writ may also require the officer to recover damages for withholding possession and costs, or costs alone, out of the property of the person who withholds possession.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 379, 380; R.S. 1887, §§ 2719, 2720; R.S. 1899, §§ 3813, 3814; C.S. 1910, §§ 4668, 4669; C.S. 1920, §§ 5941, 5942; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-2901, 89-2902; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4001, 3-4002; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-341, 1-342; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-18-101

; Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to execution of judgment against county, see §

18-2-111

.

As to execution generally, see Rule 69, W.R.C.P.

Improper to issue execution to enforce conditional judgment.
—

There can be no writ of execution properly issued to enforce a conditional judgment. Where property is sold pursuant to a writ of execution issued on such a nonexistent judgment, the sale is not conducted in conformity with the Code of Civil Procedure, as required by §

1-17-321

, and should not have to be confirmed by the district court. 2-2-H Ranch Co. v. Simmons, 658 P.2d 68,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1983).

Which clerk shall issue. —

No power exists in clerk of court in which transcript is filed to issue execution, such authority not being expressly conferred, and an execution so issued is void; rather, clerk of the court of the county where the judgment was rendered should issue execution, as authorized by this section. Wyoming Cent. Irrigation Co. v. Laporte, 26 Wyo. 522, 188 P. 360,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1920).

Redemptioner paid for unreceived, unredeemable land. —

Judgment creditors already had title to a parcel of land by virtue of a prior recorded warranty deed and their ownership interest was not affected by their execution against this land. The redemptioner, however, had paid something to redeem this land, as to which he had no right of redemption and to which the court subsequently quieted title in the judgment creditors. Under the circumstances, to refuse to permit the complaint to be amended so that the redemptioner could claim the amount paid for the parcel which he did not receive constituted an abuse of discretion. Bush v. Duff, 754 P.2d 159,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1988), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-102.
Request
for hearing when property seized under execution.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a person, other than a corporate entity, against whom a money judgment has been entered and whose property is seized under execution is entitled to a hearing within five (5) days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, after the court receives the person’s written request for a hearing to determine if the property seized is exempt from execution. The person whose property is seized shall file a written request for a hearing with the clerk of court within ten (10) days after seizure of his property.

Except where the judgment is solely against corporate entities, the court shall attach to every money judgment a notice containing the following information:

“You are informed that
since the judgment is entered the prevailing party may proceed to
seize your property, funds or wages by execution or garnishment. In
that event you may be entitled to the following exemptions:

Social security benefits pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 407 and supplemental security income;

Veteran’s benefits;

Black lung benefits;

Personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) payments;

Federal civil service and state retirement system benefits as provided in 5 U.S.C. 8346 and W.S.

9-3-426

,

9-3-620

,

9-3-712

and

15-5-313

;

Worker’s compensation benefits;

Unemployment compensation benefits;

A portion of wages as provided in W.S.

1-15-408

, or in the case of consumer credit sales, leases or loans, as provided by W.S.

40-14-505

;

Homestead, personal articles and articles used for carrying on a trade or business to the extent provided by W.S.

1-20-101

through

1-20-111

;

Other exemptions as provided by law.

To assert your right
to any of the foregoing exemptions you shall file a written request
with the clerk of court within ten (10) days after seizure of your
property, funds or wages. If you fail to make a written request for
a hearing and claim one (1) or more of the foregoing exemptions within
ten (10) days after seizure of your property, funds or wages, you
may waive or lose your right to claim the exemptions.”

The notice provided in this section shall be sent to the last known address of the judgment debtor by the clerk of court upon the request of any person before any property of the judgment debtor is seized by execution or garnishment.

A copy of the money judgment together with the exemption information shall be transmitted by the court by first class United States mail, with the postage prepaid in envelopes furnished and properly addressed by the prevailing party.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a judgment debtor who is served with a writ of continuing garnishment under W.S.

1-15-506

shall file objections to the continuing garnishment and receive a hearing on his objections as provided by W.S.

1-15-507

and

1-15-508

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 1; 1997, ch. 196, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, §§ 207, 301.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b)(v), inserted “9-3-712 and

15-5-313

” and made related change; substituted “1-20-111” for “1-20-109” in (b)(ix); and deleted “As to any judgment entered prior to June 11, 1986” at the beginning in (c).

Exemption of joint account funds requires accounting. —

When the evidence demonstrates that expenses paid from the joint account are to be shared by the depositors, the depositors' burden of establishing the exemption of any portion of the funds from execution clearly demands more than simply proving the deposits. Some accounting in the form of tracing the deposited funds and disbursements must be established. Hancock v. Stockmens Bank & Trust Co., 739 P.2d 760,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 468

(Wyo. 1987).

Relationship to due process. —

Unpublished decision:

To the extent defendant officials exceeded the scope of a writ by shipping the horses at issue to South Carolina, absolute immunity did not apply, and although Wyoming law allowed for a private sale, they were still required to retain possession (actual or constructive) until a court authorized such a sale for good cause after due notice given to the adverse party; nevertheless, there was no constitutional violation stemming from the transfer because the court ultimately held the hearing and ordered the return of all horses not subject to execution (plaintiffs received all the process they were due). Wilcox v. Magill, 468 Fed. Appx. 849, 2012 U.S. App. LEXIS 5284 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2012).

Garnishment not void. —

Although the judgment debtor was not provided with the statutorily required notices under to § 1-17-102(b) when his child support arrearages were reduced to money judgments, the garnishment of the judgment debtor's bank account funds was not void where the district court provided the judgment debtor with notice and an exemption hearing. McManaman v. McManaman, 2002 WY 128, 53 P.3d 103,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2002).